test/src/morphology/V-mato_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mâto - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâton
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâton
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâtow
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: mâtoyiwa
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâtonân
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kimâtonaw
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâtonâwâw
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâtowak
     mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oPl: mâtoyiwa

     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+1Sg: êmâtoyân
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+2Sg: êmâtoyan
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+3Sg: êmâtot
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+3oSg: êmâtoyit
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+1Pl: êmâtoyâhk
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+12Pl: êmâtoyahk
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+2Pl: êmâtonyêk
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+3Pl: êmâtocik
     mâto+V+IA+Sbj+3oPl: êmâtoyit
     
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâton
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Imm+1Pl: mâtondâ
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: [mâtok, mâtog]
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Sg: mâtoken
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Int+1Pl: mâtosiidâ
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Pl: mâtokegon
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Sg: mâtokan
     mâto+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Pl: mâtokeg
